New York, session 2025-2026, S6515.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 3 of section 311 of the execu- 2 tive law, as amended by chapter 55 of the laws of 1992, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (e) on January first of each year report to the governor and the 5 chairpersons of the senate finance and assembly ways and means commit- 6 tees on the level of minority and women-owned business enterprises 7 participating in each agency's contracts for goods and services and on 8 activities of the office and effort by each contracting agency to 9 promote employment of minority group members and women, and to promote 10 and increase participation by certified businesses with respect to state 11 contracts and subcontracts so as to facilitate the award of a fair share 12 of state contracts to such businesses. The comptroller shall assist the 13 division in collecting information on the participation of certified 14 business for each contracting agency. Such report may recommend new 15 activities and programs to effectuate the purposes of this article. Such 16 report shall include a separate section detailing every instance of an 17 entity fraudulently representing itself as a minority and women-owned 18 business enterprise when it was not; 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however that 20 the amendments to section 311 of the executive law made by section one 21 of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be 22 deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10974-01-5